Arkansas, session 2025, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 50, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-50-118. Recovery of fees.
(a) A mortgagor may recover reasonable attorney's fees under this
subchapter if a court sets aside the statutory foreclosure sale due to a
mortgagee’s failure to strictly comply with any provision of § 18-50-101 et
seq., under § 18-50-116(d)(2)(B)(ii).
(b) A mortgagor shall not be awarded attorney's fees under subsection
(a) of this section if the:
(1) Mortgagor and mortgagee reach a mutual resolution of the
debt and corresponding foreclosure;
(2) Mortgagor files a petition for bankruptcy while the
foreclosure or any related litigation is pending;
(3) Mortgagee instituted the statutory foreclosure while in good
faith relying on a policy of title insurance that was subsequently found to
*CRH106*
03-03-2025 10:09:42 CRH106

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 HB1238
be in error;
(4) Mortgagee instituted the statutory foreclosure in good faith
without knowledge of unrecorded debt on the subject property;
(5) Mortgagee instituted the statutory foreclosure in good faith
without knowledge of assessments, taxes, or liens filed against the subject
property subsequent to the final policy of title insurance being issued; or
(6) Mortgage is reinstated under § 18-50-114.

/s/Cavenaugh



























03-03-2025 10:09:42 CRH106